Hawaii statutes.
§147-93 Cooperating with federal
authority. The department of agriculture may enter into cooperative
agreements with the United States Department of Agriculture for the purpose of
grading beef, pork, mutton, and lamb carcasses. [L 1957, c 172, §1(c); am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; Supp, §22-92; HRS §147-93; am L 2003,
c 49, §6]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next